District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-802

Incorporation — Powers of body politic and corporate; taxation of property.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1284, ch. 854, § 600
Apr. 20, 1932, 47 Stat. 87, ch. 121
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(7), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-802.
1981 Ed., § 29-1002.
1973 Ed., § 29-602.